Idaho statutes. Title 15 UNIFORM PROBATE CODE
Chapter 3
PROBATE OF WILLS AND ADMINISTRATION

Part 1. General Provisions

Sec.

Part 2. Venue for Probate and Administration
— Priority to Administer —
Demand for Notice

Part 3. Informal Probate and Appointment Proceedings

15-3-303A. Notice required.

15-3-303B. In personam jurisdiction. [Repealed.]

Part 4. Formal Testacy and Appointment Proceedings

Part 5. Supervised Administration

Part 6. Personal Representative
— Appointment, Control and
Termination of Authority